Utah statutes.
63M-7-515.   Rules for contested claims -- Exemption from Administrative Procedures Act.

(1)  Rules for procedures for contested determinations by a reparations officer shall be adopted pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2)  The Utah Office for Victims of Crime is exempt from Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

